Wyoming, session 2025, HB0124.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 12-2-201(c), 12-2-302(a),
12-3-101(a), (b) and (d) and 12-3-102(a) are amended to
read:

12-2-201. Wholesale license for sale of malt
beverages only; fee.

HB0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0453
(c) A malt beverage wholesaler may sell to or
purchase from another malt beverage wholesaler only those
products the purchasing wholesaler is licensed to sell
within his designated territory. A copy of the invoice of
the transaction shall be submitted to the division by the
seller. State excise tax shall be reported and paid by the
licensed malt beverage wholesaler who has imported the
products into the state.

12-2-302. Collection of excise taxes; disposition of
revenue and fees.

(a) The division shall collect all excise taxes
provided by this title relating to alcoholic and malt
beverages liquors for deposit into the general fund.

12-3-101. Excise tax to be paid; limitation on liquor
or malt beverage importation; penalties.

(a) An excise tax is assessed and shall be collected
by the division equal to three-fourths of one cent ($.0075)
per one hundred (100) milliliters (3.4 ounces) or fraction
thereof on wine, and two and one-half cents ($.025) per one
HB0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0453
hundred (100) milliliters (3.4 ounces) or fraction thereof
on spirituous liquors. and one-half cent ($.005) per liter
(33.8 ounces) or fraction thereof on malt beverages. The
appropriate excise tax shall be collected on all alcoholic
or malt beverages liquors sold, offered for sale or use in
this state. An excise tax shall not be assessed and
collected on malt beverages under this section.

(b) It is unlawful for any licensee to receive or
possess any alcoholic or malt beverage liquor upon which
state excise taxes have not been paid.

(d) No person shall, without authorization from the
division or by law, personally transport alcoholic liquor
or malt beverages into Wyoming for sale, use or consumption
in the state when the applicable state excise tax has not
been paid. No person, without authorization from the
division or by law, shall import or transport at any given
time more than three (3) liters of alcoholic liquor
excluding wine, nine (9) liters of wine or five (5) gallons
of malt beverage for the personal use of the possessor into
Wyoming. if the applicable state taxes have not been paid.
This subsection shall not apply to a person importing
HB0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0453
manufactured wine in accordance with the provisions of W.S.
12-2-204.

12-3-102. Confiscation authorized; disposition; when
seizure permitted.

(a) When an authorized inspector discovers alcoholic
liquors or malt beverages upon which excise taxes have not
been paid in the possession of a licensee, he shall take
possession of and hold the alcoholic liquors or malt
beverages as evidence against the offender. If the offender
is convicted of a violation of W.S. 12-3-101, the court
shall order that the untaxed alcoholic liquor or beverage
be delivered to the division, if merchantable, where it
will be added to its stock and sold in the usual course of
business. If the alcoholic liquors or beverages are
determined to be nonmerchantable, the court shall order
their destruction. This subsection shall not apply to
homemade beverages that are provided in accordance with an
event under W.S. 12-10-102, provided that the beverages
shall be removed from the premises within twenty-four (24)
hours following the end of the event.

HB0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0453
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0124